Illinois, session 104th, SB3183.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Attorney General Act is amended by changing 5Section 6.3 as follows: 6    (15 ILCS 205/6.3)7    Sec. 6.3. Worker Protection Unit.8    (a) The General Assembly finds that the welfare and 9prosperity of all Illinois citizens and businesses requires 10the establishment of a Unit within the Attorney General's 11Office dedicated to combatting businesses that underpay their 12employees, force their employees to work in unsafe conditions, 13and gain an unfair economic advantage by avoiding their tax 14and labor responsibilities. The Worker Protection Unit shall 15be focused on protecting the State's workforce to ensure 16workers are paid properly, guarantee safe workplaces, and 17allow law-abiding business owners to thrive through healthy 18and fair competition. Businesses that violate the State's 19worker protection laws put a greater burden on taxpayers by 20hurting the State's ability to provide critical services; 21compliant businesses cannot compete against those who gain an 22unfair advantage by evading their responsibilities.23    (b) There is created within the Office of the Attorney   SB3183- 2 -LRB104 19321 SPS 32767 b1General a Worker Protection Unit, consisting of Assistant 2Attorneys General appointed by the Attorney General, who, 3together with other staff as deemed necessary by the Attorney 4General, shall have the power and duty on behalf of persons 5within this State, to intervene in, initiate, and enforce all 6legal proceedings on matters related to the payment of wages, 7the safety of the workplace, and fair employment practices, 8including, without limitation, the provisions of the 9Prevailing Wage Act, the Employee Classification Act, the 10Minimum Wage Law, the Day and Temporary Labor Services Act, or 11the Wage Payment and Collection Act, and any other law 12regarding labor or employment in this State, whenever the 13Attorney General determines that such action is necessary to 14protect the rights and interests of Illinois workers and 15Illinois businesses.16    (c) Prior to initiating an action, the Attorney General 17shall conduct an investigation and may: (1) require an 18individual or entity to file a statement or report in writing 19under oath or otherwise, as to all information the Attorney 20General may consider necessary; (2) examine under oath any 21person alleged to have participated in or with knowledge of 22the alleged violation; or (3) issue subpoenas for documents; 23(4) require written answers under oath to written 24interrogatories; (5) or conduct hearings in aid of any 25investigation; (6) inspect the premises of an employer and 26inspect and make copies of employment-related records kept at   SB3183- 3 -LRB104 19321 SPS 32767 b1the premises; and (7) conduct interviews with workers at an 2employer's premises during normal business or working hours.3    (c-5) An employer who is subject to an investigation by 4the Attorney General, and any agents of the employer, shall 5make all reasonable efforts to cooperate with the 6investigation, including, without limitation, by making the 7employer's premises and records available for inspection and 8by permitting the employer's employees to participate in 9interviews conducted by the Attorney General.10    (c-10) Any individual, including an employee, who 11voluntarily participates in an interview conducted by the 12Attorney General or otherwise provides information to the 13Attorney General related to an investigation conducted by the 14Worker Protection Unit is a confidential government informer 15for purposes of asserting the government informer's privilege.16    (c-15) The production of documentary material in response 17to a subpoena served in accordance with this Section shall be 18made under a sworn certificate, in such form as the subpoena 19designates, by the person, if a natural person, to whom the 20demand is directed or, if not a natural person, by a person or 21persons having knowledge of the facts and circumstances 22relating to such production, to the effect that all of the 23documentary material required by the demand and in the 24possession, custody, or control of the person to whom the 25demand is directed has been produced and made available to the 26custodian. Answers to interrogatories and statements or   SB3183- 4 -LRB104 19321 SPS 32767 b1reports in writing shall be accompanied by a statement under 2oath attesting to the accuracy of the answers.3    (c-20) If a witness served with a subpoena by the Attorney 4General under this Act fails or refuses to obey the subpoena, 5produce documentary material or interrogatory answers, give 6testimony in the investigation being conducted, or deny the 7Attorney General reasonable access to their premises, records, 8or employees, the Attorney General may petition the Circuit 9Court of Sangamon County, Cook County, or the county in which 10the witness resides for an order requiring the witness to 11attend and testify or produce the documentary material or 12interrogatory answers demanded, or grant access to the 13premises, records, and employees, or otherwise comply with the 14subpoena. The court's order shall require the witness to 15attend and testify or produce the documentary material or 16interrogatory answers, or a combination thereof, or grant 17access to their premises, records, or employees, by a 18specified date, and shall further provide a date on which the 19witness shall show cause in court why he or she should not be 20held in contempt of court if the witness fails to comply. If 21the witness is held in contempt of court, the Attorney General 22may seek a writ of attachment, a monetary fine, or an 23equivalent order from the circuit court having jurisdiction 24over the witness.25    (c-25) No person shall, with intent to avoid, evade, 26prevent, or obstruct compliance in whole or in part by any   SB3183- 5 -LRB104 19321 SPS 32767 b1person with any duly served subpoena of the Attorney General 2under this Section, knowingly remove from any place, conceal, 3withhold, destroy, mutilate, alter, or by any other means 4falsify any documentary material that is the subject of such 5subpoena. A violation of this subsection is a Class A 6misdemeanor. The Attorney General, with such assistance as he 7may from time to time require of the State's Attorneys in the 8several counties, shall investigate suspected violations of 9this subsection and shall commence and try all prosecutions 10under this subsection.11    (c-30) If, in the course of an investigation conducted in 12accordance with subsection (c), the Attorney General believes 13that relevant evidence of a violation of a law enforced by the 14Worker Protection Unit as set forth in subsection (b) of this 15Section is located at the premises of an employer, and (i) the 16employer has refused to allow the Attorney General to inspect 17the premises, or (ii) the Attorney General has reasonable 18cause to believe that an immediate inspection of the premises 19is necessary to carry out its investigation, the Attorney 20General may file or cause to be filed an application in 21writing, verified by affidavit, with any court within whose 22jurisdiction the premises to be searched is situated, stating 23the facts upon which the belief is founded, the premises to be 24searched, and the property, records, or other evidence to be 25seized, and procure a search warrant and execute that warrant. 26Upon the execution of the search warrant, the Attorney General   SB3183- 6 -LRB104 19321 SPS 32767 b1shall make due return of the warrant to the court issuing the 2warrant, together with an inventory of the property, records, 3or other evidence taken under the warrant.4    (d) In an action brought under this Section, the Attorney 5General may obtain, as a remedy, monetary damages to the 6State, restitution, and equitable relief, including any 7permanent or preliminary injunction, temporary restraining 8order, or other order, including an order enjoining the 9defendant from engaging in a violation, or order any action as 10may be appropriate. In addition, the Attorney General may 11request and the court may impose a civil penalty against any 12person or entity found by the court to have violated any law 13regarding labor or employment in this State, including the 14Prevailing Wage Act, the Employee Classification Act, the 15Minimum Wage Law, the Day and Temporary Labor Services Act, 16the Wage Payment and Collection Act, or any other law related 17to the payment of wages, the safety of the workplace, or fair 18employment practices, in a sum not to exceed the maximum 19amount of any civil penalty prescribed by law. Neither the 20State nor an aggrieved individual may recover monetary relief, 21including civil penalties, in more than one proceeding related 22to the same violation.23    (e) Upon the Attorney General's request, the Illinois 24Department of Labor shall provide any materials or documents 25already in the Department's possession pertaining to the 26enforcement of this Section. The Office of the Attorney   SB3183- 7 -LRB104 19321 SPS 32767 b1General may use information obtained under this Section, 2including information that is designated as and that qualifies 3for confidential treatment, which information the Attorney 4General's Office shall maintain as confidential, for law 5enforcement purposes only, which information may be shared 6with other law enforcement officials. Nothing in this Section 7is intended to take away or limit any powers of the Attorney 8General under common law or other statutory law.9(Source: P.A. 101-527, eff. 1-1-20.)